orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.aff
# Traduction en français à but indicatif de la licence Expat (MIT) :
#
# Droit d'auteur © 2014-2018 Kamal Buɛmara, Paul Anderson,
# Sonia Achour, Samira Aissou, Samira Amari, Hamza Aouchiche, Salim Ayad,
# Karim Boukhennaf, Nadir Bouremani, Wehhab Boussekkar, Lyes Ferguenis, 
# Liza Gelloudi, Nassim Hamil, Muḥend u Remṭan Iɣit, Karima Kacel, Lynda Kadri,
# Nabil Mehdioui, Ridha Meziani, Lynda Ouatah, Atmane Rahmani, Mustapha Tidjet, 
# Mohand Cherif Zeggagh
# et les autres contributeurs au projet "Imseɣti n tira n teqbaylit"
# | http://tiranteqbaylit.sourceforge.net/
#
# Les informations de contact sont disponibles sur
# https://www.facebook.com/Imseɣti-229008504335590/
#
# La permission est donnée, gratuitement, à n'importe quelle personne obtenant
# une copie de ce logiciel et des fichiers de documentation associés
# (ci-après le "Logiciel"), d'utiliser le Logiciel sans restriction, ce qui
# inclut sans limite, le droit d'utiliser, copier, modifier, fusionner, publier,
# distribuer, sous-licencier et / ou vendre des copies du Logiciel, et de
# permettre aux personnes auxquelles le Logiciel est fourni de faire de même,
# avec les conditions suivantes :
#
# La notice de copyright ci-dessus et cette notice doivent être incluses dans
# toutes les copies ou portions substantielles du Logiciel.
#
# LE LOGICIEL EST FOURNI "TEL QUEL", SANS GARANTIE D'AUCUNE SORTE, EXPLICITE OU
# IMPLICITE, NOTAMMENT SANS GARANTIE DE QUALITÉ MARCHANDE, D’ADÉQUATION À UN
# USAGE PARTICULIER ET D'ABSENCE DE CONTREFAÇON. EN AUCUN CAS, LES AUTEURS OU
# TITULAIRES DU DROIT D'AUTEUR NE SERONT RESPONSABLES DE TOUT DOMMAGE,
# RÉCLAMATION OU AUTRE RESPONSABILITÉ, QUE CE SOIT DANS LE CADRE D'UN CONTRAT,
# D'UN DÉLIT OU AUTRE, EN PROVENANCE DE, CONSÉCUTIF À OU EN RELATION AVEC LE
# LOGICIEL OU SON UTILISATION, OU AVEC D'AUTRES ÉLÉMENTS DU LOGICIEL.
#
# Attention : C'est une traduction de la version anglaise originale.
# Dans le cas de différences éventuelles entre le sens de la version anglaise
# originale et cette traduction, la version anglaise originale prévaudra :
#
#
# Copyright © 2014-2018 Kamal Buɛmara, Paul Anderson,
# Sonia Achour, Samira Aissou, Samira Amari, Hamza Aouchiche, Salim Ayad,
# Karim Boukhennaf, Nadir Bouremani, Wehhab Boussekkar, Lyes Ferguenis, 
# Liza Gelloudi, Nassim Hamil, Muḥend u Remṭan Iɣit, Karima Kacel, Lynda Kadri,
# Nabil Mehdioui, Ridha Meziani, Lynda Ouatah, Atmane Rahmani, Mustapha Tidjet, 
# Mohand Cherif Zeggagh
# and the other contributors to the "Imseɣti n tira n teqbaylit" project
# | http://tiranteqbaylit.sourceforge.net/
#
# Contact information is available at
# https://www.facebook.com/Imseɣti-229008504335590/
#
# Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a copy
# of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"), to deal
# in the Software without restriction, including without limitation the rights
# to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense, and/or sell
# copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the Software is
# furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
#
# The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
# all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
#
# THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
# IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
# FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
# AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
# LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM,
# OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN
# THE SOFTWARE.
#


SET UTF-8
CIRCUMFIX X
#WORDCHARS -
WORDCHARS °˚ʷ

BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK ‑
#NON-BREAKING HYPHEN
#BREAK ^-
#BREAK -$

REP 8
REP we wa
REP u wa
REP we u
REP aɣ eɣ
REP r ṛ
REP ṣ$ ẓ
REP ṭ$ ḍ
REP a e

MAP 30
MAP ae
MAP ğǧ
MAP vb
MAP uow
MAP iy
MAP tṭ
MAP dḍ
MAP jǧ
MAP rṛ
MAP sṣ
MAP hḥ
MAP zẓ
MAP (gh)ɣ
MAP âɛ
MAP (ou)w
MAP (ou)u
MAP (dh)ḍ
MAP (dh)d
MAP (th)t
MAP ṭḍ
MAP (dj)ǧ
MAP (ch)c
MAP (kh)x
MAP ṭ(ḍt)
MAP (aa)ɛ
MAP (tch)č
MAP (tch)(čč)
MAP cč
MAP wʷ
MAP w˚

COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG j

# VERBS

PFX E Y 2
PFX E e 0/X e is:e
PFX E 0 0/X [^e] is:e
# Empty rule must be triggered - not an option - otherwise circumfix invalid. Not e simpler than below.
#PFX E 0 0/X [aiubcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:e

SFX a Y 2
SFX a 0 ɣ/EX [aiu] is:udem1sf
SFX a 0 eɣ/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem1sf

SFX c Y 2
SFX c 0 ḍ/PX [aiu] is:udem2sf
SFX c 0 eḍ/PX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem2sf

SFX C Y 2
SFX C 0 m/PX [aiu] is:udem2mlsg
SFX C 0 em/PX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem2mlsg

# Amyag n tɣara, suffix only.
SFX d N 2
SFX d 0 ḍ [aiu] is:udem2sf
SFX d 0 eḍ [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem2sf

SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 mt/PX [aiu] is:udem2ntsg
SFX D 0 emt/PX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem2ntsg

SFX M Y 2
SFX M 0 n/EX [aiu] is:udem3mlsg
SFX M 0 en/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem3mlsg

# 3rd person feminine plural
SFX U Y 2
SFX U 0 nt/EX [aiu] is:udem3ntsg
SFX U 0 ent/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:udem3ntsg

# Imperative masculine plural form 1
SFX G Y 2
SFX G 0 t/EX [aiu] is:anaḍmlsg1
SFX G 0 et/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:anaḍmlsg1

# Amyag n tɣara, suffix only.
SFX f N 1
SFX f 0 et . is:udem3ntsf

# Amyag n tɣara, all plurals, suffix only.
SFX g N 1
SFX g 0 it . is:sg

# Imperative masculine plural form 2
SFX H Y 2
SFX H 0 m/EX [aiu] is:anaḍmlsg2
SFX H 0 em/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:anaḍmlsg2

# Imperative feminine plural
SFX F Y 2
SFX F 0 mt/EX [aiu] is:anaḍntsg
SFX F 0 emt/EX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:anaḍntsg

# 3rd person masculine singular, and participle (internal - circumfix)
PFX m N 15
PFX m 0 i [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 i [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 ye [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 ye [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 y [aiu] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e i e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e i e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e ye e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e ye e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e ye e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 i [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m 0 i [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e i e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e i e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
PFX m e i e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3mlsf
# 5 last in each case (/X and without) are iCC alternative for the yeCC verb conditions - with and without e dropping.
