orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.dic
cabi/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
ttcellil/xacmuACDMUGHF st:cellel is:urmir_ussid
ceṛṛen/muA po:amyag
cukct/xacmuACDMUGHF st:cukcet is:flippedAoristNZ
cukcut/xacmuACDMUGHF st:cukcet is:urmir_ussid
tedds/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ddes is:flippedUrmirUssid
dfiɛ/VacmuACDMU st:dfeɛ is:izri_ibaw
ders/xacmuACDMUGHF st:dres is:flippedAorist
derrs/xacmuACDMUGHF st:dres is:flippedUrmirUssid
ffrefr/xacmuACDMUGHF st:fferfer is:flippedAorist
fehhm/xacmuACDMUGHF st:fhem is:flippedUrmirUssid
faḍ/VxacmuACDMU st:ifiḍ is:izri
ttefruri/xacmuACDMUGHF st:fruri is:urmir_ussid
gelz/xacmuACDMUGHF st:glez is:flippedAorist
gellz/xacmuACDMUGHF st:glez is:flippedUrmirUssid
gezzu/xacmuACDMUGHF st:gzu is:urmir_ussid
ttḥellil/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ḥellel is:urmir_ussid
ḥiz/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
ḥkim/VacmuACDMU st:ḥkem is:izri_ibaw
ḥlaw/zadfg st:iḥliw is:izri
huz/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
jemɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:jmeɛ is:flippedAorist
jerḥ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:jreḥ is:flippedAorist
ttkemmic/xacmuACDMUGHF st:kemmec is:urmir_ussid
kemmil/zadfg st:ikmil is:izri
lawi/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
ttleggim/xacmuACDMUGHF st:leggem is:urmir_ussid
ulim/VacmuACDMU st:alem is:izri_ibaw
lṭif/zadfg st:ilṭif is:izri
meccḍ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:mceḍ is:flippedUrmirUssid
ttmels/xacmuACDMUGHF st:mmels is:urmir_ussid
mqellaɛn/zadfg st:mqelleɛ is:izri is:flipped
merriɣ/zadfg st:imriɣ is:izri
mesneɣn/zadfg st:msenɣ is:izri is:flipped
musalay/zadfg st:musayel is:izri
neddf/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ndef is:flippedUrmirUssid
neddṛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ndeṛ is:flippedUrmirUssid
ndi/VacmuACDMU st:ndu is:izri_ibaw
neffu/xacmuACDMUGHF st:nfu is:urmir_ussid
ttnefli/xacmuACDMUGHF st:nnefli is:urmir_ussid
qqezqez/muA po:amyag is:substitutedFromAorist
qlil/zadfg st:iqlil is:izri
tteqmumus/xacmuACDMUGHF st:qmumes is:urmir_ussid
qqd/xacmuACDMUGHF st:qqed is:flippedAorist
qeṛb/xacmuACDMUGHF st:qṛeb is:flippedAorist
qesf/xacmuACDMUGHF st:qsef is:flippedAorist
turw/zadfg st:arew is:izri is:flipped
rqiq/zadfg st:irqiq is:izri
ṛḍib/VacmuACDMU st:ṛḍeb is:izri_ibaw
ttɣafar/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ɣafer is:urmir_ussid
ɣsib/VacmuACDMU st:ɣseb is:izri_ibaw
ɣezzl/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ɣzel is:flippedUrmirUssid
ɣzi/VacmuACDMU st:ɣzu is:izri_ibaw
sbuɣer/muA po:amyag
sbuɣur/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sbuɣer is:urmir_ussid
tseddr/zadfg st:sedder is:izri is:flipped
semḥillq/xacmuACDMUGHF st:semḥilleq is:flippedAorist
ttsemiɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:semmeɛ is:urmir_ussid
snedh/xacmuACDMU st:ssendeh is:izri is:flippedFromParticiple
ssendeh/VacmuACDMU st:sendeh is:izri_ibaw
ssqecr/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sseqcer is:flippedAorist
sifeg/muA po:amyag
saḥ/VxacmuACDMU st:siḥ is:izri
ssalɣ/xacmuACDMU st:ssileɣ is:izri is:flipped
ssilewɣ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ssilweɣ is:flippedAorist
siɣezf/xacmuACDMUGHF st:siɣzef is:flippedAorist
smehder/muA po:amyag
semmḍ/zadfg st:ismiḍ is:izri is:flipped
sɣil/VacmuACDMU st:sɣel is:izri_ibaw
steqsi/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
steɣfir/xacmuACDMUGHF st:steɣfer is:urmir_ussid
sunẓay/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sunẓi is:urmir_ussid is:substituted
susuy/xacmuACDMUGHF st:susi is:urmir_ussid
wujb/xacmuACDMU st:wajeb is:izri is:flipped
wennt/xacmuACDMUGHF st:wennet is:flippedAorist
wennɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:wenneɛ is:flippedAorist
ttwenniɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:wenneɛ is:urmir_ussid
wessr/zadfg st:iwsir is:izri is:flipped
zerrg/xacmuACDMUGHF st:zerreg is:flippedAorist
zeggl/xacmuACDMUGHF st:zgel is:flippedUrmirUssid
ttazu/xacmuACDMUGHF st:azu is:urmir_ussid
zzim/VacmuACDMU st:zzem is:izri_ibaw
tezzm/xacmuACDMUGHF st:zzem is:flippedUrmirUssid
ẓid/zadfg st:iẓid is:izri
ttɛeyyin/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ɛeyyen is:urmir_ussid
ttatem/xacmuACDMUGHF st:atem
ufay/zadfg st:awfay
belɛ/VxacCDMUGHF st:bleɛ
buṭṭi/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
can/xacmuACDMU  st:can is:izri_ibaw
cbi/VxacmuACDMU st:cbu
cba/muACDMU st:cbu
ttceggiɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ceggeɛ
ṛɣi/VxacmuACDMU st:eṛɣ
ḥlaw/zadfg st:iḥliw
ḥnin/zadfg st:iḥnin
meẓẓi/zadfg st:imẓi
qeṛṛiḥ/zadfg st:iqṛiḥ
semmḍ/zafg st:ismiḍ is:izri
ttissin/xacmuACDMUGHF st:issin
werraɣ/zadfg st:iwriɣ
zeggaɣ/zadfg st:izwiɣ
ẓid/zadfg st:iẓid
kerz/VxacCDMUGHF st:krez
kerrez/xacmuACDMUGHF st:krez is:urmir_ussid
ttlall/xacmuACDMUGHF st:lal
llaẓ/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
mmhemh/VxacCDMUGHF st:mmehmeh
mminǧaɛ/xACDMUGHF po:amyag
nṭed/muA po:amyag
sedha/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sedhu is:izri
sedhuy/xacmuACDMU st:sedhu is:urmir_ussid
sfehm/VxacACDMUGHF st:sefhem
senhezz/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag is:aswaɣ
sifess/VxacCDMUGHF st:sifses
siḥelw/VxacCDMUGHF st:siḥlew
silewɣ/xacCDMUGHF st:silweɣ
simriɣ/acmuACDMUGHF st:simreɣ is:urmir_ussid
squccem/muA po:amyag
ttwasutr/VxacACDMUGHF st:ttwasuter
ttwaṭṭaf/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ttwaṭṭef is:urmir_ussid
ttwaṭṭf/VxacCDMUGHF st:ttwaṭṭef
ttwaɛbas/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ttwaɛbes
usi/VxxacmuACDMUGHF st:usu is:izri
zzwaray/xacmuACDMUGMF st:zzwer is:urmir_ussid
qesḥ/VxacCDMUGHF st:qseḥ
skuṭṭf/VxacCDMUGHF st:skuṭṭef
senzenz/VxacCDMUGHF st:sneznez
ɣcawt/VxacCDMUGHF st:ɣcawet
ttxiḍi/xacmuCDMUGHF st:xiḍ is:urmir_ussid
neqqi/xacmuCDMUGHF po:amyag
